Utah statutes.
17B-1-903.   Authority to require written application for water or sewer
service and to terminate for failure to pay -- Limitations.
(1)  A local district that owns or controls a system for furnishing water or
providing sewer service or both may:
(a)  before furnishing water or providing sewer service to a property, require
the property owner or an authorized agent to submit a written application,
signed by the owner or an authorized agent, agreeing to pay for all water
furnished or sewer service provided to the property, whether occupied by the
owner or by a tenant or other occupant, according to the rules and regulations
adopted by the local district; and
(b)  if a customer fails to pay for water furnished or sewer service provided
to the customer's property, discontinue furnishing water or providing sewer
service to the property until all amounts for water furnished or sewer service
provided are paid, subject to Subsection (2).
(2)  Unless a valid lien has been established as provided in Section
17B-1-902, has not been satisfied, and has not been terminated by a sale as
provided in Subsection 17B-1-902(2), a local district may not:
(a)  use a customer's failure to pay for water furnished or sewer service
provided to the customer's property as a basis for not furnishing water or
providing sewer service to the property after ownership of the property is
transferred to a subsequent owner; or
(b)  require an owner to pay for water that was furnished or sewer service
that was provided to the property before the owner's ownership.
